Washington statutes.
RCW 35.36.020

Coupons—Printing facsimile signatures.

A facsimile reproduction of the signature of the mayor, city comptroller, or city clerk in every city of the first class may be printed, engraved, or lithographed upon bond coupons with the same effect as though the particular officer had signed the coupon in person.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.36.020. Prior: 1929 c 212 s 4; RRS s 9005-8.]